first.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+V +meOne +Y +We +Ys +They

! Lexicon containing lexical stems:
LEXICON Root
 parl V ;
 mang V ;
 cherch V ;
 fromage N ;
 frite N;
 vino N;
 pant N;
 viande N;
 plato N;
 lapin N;
 fourchette N;
 pomme N;
 voiture N;


! Lexicon containing POS tag only:
LEXICON V
+V: V-suff ;

LEXICON N
+N: N-suff ;

! Lexicon containing inflectional suffixes and corresponding tags:
LEXICON V-suff
+meOne:e   # ;
+Y:es  # ;
+We:ons # ;
+Ys:ez    # ;
+They:ent  # ;
+None:  # ;

LEXICON N-suff
+Plrl:s # ;
+Sngl: # ;
